Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 5. Uranium

§ 39-14-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Arm’s-length market or sales price” means the transaction price determined in connection with a bona fide arm’s length sale;

“Bona fide arm’s-length sale” means a transaction in cash or terms equivalent to cash for specified property rights after reasonable exposure in a competitive market between a willing, well informed and prudent buyer and seller with adverse economic interests and assuming neither party is acting under undue compulsion or duress;

“Department review” means, but is not limited to, corrections of clerical errors or reconciliations of tax reports with reports required by other state or federal agencies;

“Mine product valuation amendment” means a valuation adjustment determination made by the department including special directives;

“Mining or production” means drilling, blasting, loading, roadwork, overburden removal, pre-mouth of the mine reclamation, transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and maintenance of facilities and equipment directly relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph;

“Mouth of the mine” means the point at which a mineral is brought to the surface of the ground and is taken out of the pit, shaft or portal. For a surface mine, this point shall be the top of the ramp where the road or conveying system leaves the pit. For an in situ mine, the point shall be the wellhead;

“Processing” means crushing, sizing, milling, washing, drying, refining, upgrading, beneficiation, sampling, testing, treating, heating, separating, tailings or reject material disposal, compressing, storing, loading for shipment, transportation from the mouth of the mine to the loadout, transportation to market to the extent included in the price and provided by the producer, processing plant site and post-mouth of mine reclamation, maintenance of facilities and equipment relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph, and any other function after severance that changes the physical or chemical characteristics or enhances the marketability of the mineral;

“Purchaser” means the first purchaser who acquires the produced valuable uranium deposit from the taxpayer for value;

“Severance tax” means an excise tax imposed on the present and continuing privilege of removing, extracting, severing or producing any mineral in this state;

Beginning January 1, 1989, “taxable value” means one hundred percent (100%) of the fair market value of the gross product of minerals and mine products;

“Unreported production” means production volume for which no tax report was filed for the reporting period by the taxpayer or his agent;

“Value of the gross product” means fair market value as prescribed by W.S. 39-11-101(a)(vi), less any deductions and exemption allowed by Wyoming law or rules.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 59, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Change in valuation method not “rule.” —

Letters issued by the department of revenue and taxation to announce a change in the valuation method for calculating the severance tax on uranium ore did not constitute “rules” and therefore did not require adoption pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16). Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

BP America Prod. Co. v. Department of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006).

§ 39-14-502.
Administration; confidentiality.

The department shall annually value and assess the gross product of all mines and mining claims at its fair market value for taxation.

The department shall annually value the gross product for the preceding calendar year, in appropriate unit measures of all mines and mining claims from which valuable deposits are produced.

Annually, on or before June 1, or as soon thereafter as the fair market value is determined, the department shall certify the valuation determined by the department to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county.

All taxpayer returns and return information shall be confidential and, except as authorized below, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall disclose any such information obtained by him in connection with his service as an officer or employee.

As used in this section, taxpayer returns and return information shall include, but not be limited to, all statements, reports, summaries and all other data and documents under audit or provided by the taxpayer in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 39-14-507(a) and related provision.

Without written authorization from the taxpayer, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall release taxpayer returns and return information pertaining to taxes imposed by this article, except:

Information may be released to the governor or his designee, members of the board, to employees of the department of audit, the department of revenue, the consensus revenue estimating group and to the attorney general;

Upon prior notice to the taxpayer, information may be released by the department, upon written application, to any other governmental entity if the governmental entity shows sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business;

Information is admissible in court or administrative proceedings related to mineral taxes or government royalties.

Any person receiving information pursuant to paragraph (f)(ii) of this section shall sign an agreement with the department to keep the information confidential.

Units of production reported by the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s taxable value are not confidential and may be released without qualification.

Any person who negligently violates subsections (d) through (h) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any person who intentionally violates subsections (d) through (h) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisoned for not more than one (1) year.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Department of revenue and taxation was not required to continue invalid pricing system

used in 1985 for determining the severance tax on uranium, where the system afforded no reasonable relationship to market value and was illegal and contrary to the constitutional mandates of equal and uniform taxation. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Reporting of oil production should be done at wellhead. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue properly reallocated a production company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-2-201(e) always contemplated that reporting of oil production should be done at the wellhead, and the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. Ann § 39-2-213 (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-207(a)(iii)) did not constitute a ‘change,’ but only a restatement of what general practice had always been contemplated, the practice that was generally in place, and the practice that should generally continue. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 39-14-503.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied a severance tax on the value of the gross product for the privilege of severing or extracting uranium in the state. The severance tax imposed by this article may be in addition to other taxes, including but not limited to the ad valorem taxes imposed by W.S.

39-13-104

.

Basis of tax (valuation). Except as provided in W.S. 39-14-504(b) and (c), the following shall apply:

Uranium shall be valued for taxation as provided in this section;

The value of the gross product shall be the fair market value of the product at the mouth of the mine where produced, after the mining or production process is completed;

Except as otherwise provided, the mining or production process is deemed completed when mineral product reaches the mouth of the mine. In no event shall the value of the mineral product include any processing functions or operations regardless of where the processing is performed;

In the event the product as provided by paragraph (iii) of this subsection is sold at the mouth of the mine without further movement or processing, the fair market value shall be the price established by bona fide arms-length sale less exempt royalties;

In the event the mineral product as provided by paragraph (iii) of this subsection is not sold at the mouth of the mine by a bona fide arms-length sale, or, except as otherwise provided, if the product of the mine is used without sale, the department shall determine the fair market value of uranium in accordance with paragraph (vi) or (vii) of this subsection;

The department shall calculate the fair market value of uranium by multiplying the individual producer’s sales value of yellow cake less all royalties, ad valorem production taxes, and severance taxes multiplied by the industry factor. The industry factor shall be an average of all uranium producers’ ratios of total mining costs to total mining and processing costs incurred to produce yellow cake calculated by the department. Nonexempt royalties, ad valorem production taxes and severance taxes shall then be added to determine taxable value. For purposes of this paragraph:

Total mining costs for in situ mines include labor, including mine foremen and supervisory personnel whose primary function is the extraction of uranium, supplies, equipment depreciation and maintenance, fuel, power and other utilities, uranium transportation to the point of valuation, indirect costs related to extraction and any other costs incurred prior to the point of valuation that are specifically attributable to the installation of the well field, pumps used for extraction or injection, or any other extraction activity;

Total mining costs for conventional surface and underground mines include labor, including mine foremen and supervisory personnel whose primary function is the extraction of uranium, supplies, equipment depreciation and maintenance, fuel, power and other utilities, uranium transportation to the point of valuation, indirect costs related to extraction and any other costs incurred prior to the point of valuation that are specifically attributable to the excavation and transportation of ore to the mine mouth;

Total mining and processing costs include mining costs determined under subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph plus mineral processing labor including plant foremen and supervisory personnel whose primary responsibility is processing uranium, supplies used for processing, processing plant and equipment depreciation, fuel, power and other utilities used for processing, maintenance of processing equipment, uranium transportation from the mouth of the mine to the point of shipment, indirect processing costs and any other costs incurred that are specifically attributable to the mining or processing of uranium up to the point of sale f.o.b. the mine;

Indirect costs include but are not limited to allocations of corporate overhead, data processing costs, accounting, legal and clerical costs and other general and administrative costs which cannot be specifically attributed to an operational function without allocation. Indirect costs shall be allocated using methods in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Similar costs shall be allocated using the same method for each producer;

The industry factor shall be recomputed at four (4) year intervals and will be based on an average of the four (4) prior years’ cost data. The new ratio shall be effective prospectively.

In the event that unique or unusual circumstances exist such that the department or the taxpayer is unable to determine the value of the gross product of uranium from a mine or mining claim by application of the methods provided in this subsection, the taxpayer may petition the department for approval to use an alternate valuation method. The department shall approve or deny the use of an alternate valuation method and shall so inform the parties within forty-five (45) days of the date the petition is filed.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

In the case of the gross product of all mines and mining claims produced under lease, the lessor is liable for the payment of ad valorem taxes on the product removed only to the extent of the lessor’s retained interest under the lease, whether royalty or otherwise, and the lessee or his assignee is liable for all other property taxes due on production under the lease;

Any taxpayer paying the taxes imposed by this article on any valuable deposit may deduct the severance taxes paid from any amounts due or to become due to the interest owners of such valuable deposit in proportion to the interest ownership;

Any person extracting valuable products subject to this article and any person owning an interest in the valuable products to the extent of their interest ownership are liable for the payment of the severance taxes imposed by this article together with any penalties and interest.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; 2020 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (b) added “Except as provided in W.S. 39-14-504(b) and (c)” preceding “the following.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 39-14-504.
Tax rate.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the total severance tax rate for uranium shall be four percent (4%). The tax shall be distributed as provided in W.S.

39-14-511

and is imposed as follows:

Two percent (2%); plus

Two percent (2%).

The severance tax imposed under subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any uranium production occurring after December 31, 2020, and before January 1, 2026. For the period of time prescribed under this subsection, there is levied a severance tax at the rates specified in subsection (c) of this section. The severance tax shall be levied on the value of the gross product extracted each month for which the spot market price per pound of nonenriched uranium concentrate (U3O8) is at least thirty dollars ($30.00) as determined by an average of the following international indexes or their successors quoting the monthly price of nonenriched uranium concentrate (U3O8):

NUEXCO from TradeTech;

Ux U3O8 spot price.

The uranium spot market price used in the table in this subsection is the price per pound of nonenriched uranium concentrate (U3O8). The value of uranium for purposes of the severance tax in subsection (b) of this section shall be determined in accordance with the following table:

Uranium Spot Market Price Tax Applied Less than $30.00 0% $30.00 to $36.67 1% $36.68 to $43.34 2% $43.35 to $50.00 3% $50.01 to $60.00 4% $60.01 or more 5%

Click to view

Subsections (b) through (e) of this section are repealed effective December 31, 2026.

No taxpayer shall qualify for the severance tax rate imposed under subsections (b) and (c) of this section unless the county treasurer annually certifies to the department that the taxpayer does not have any unpaid delinquent ad valorem tax in the county from within which the uranium was severed or extracted.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2020 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) added “Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section” at the beginning; and added (b) through (e).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 39-14-505.
Exemptions.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

There are no specific applicable provisions for exemptions for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 48, § 1; 2003, ch. 105, § 1; 2016 ch. 16, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 16 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, added (c).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 16 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a) and (b), which read: “(a) All uranium production occurring after January 1, 1995, and before March 31, 2009, is exempt from the tax provided in W.S.

39-14-504

, except there is levied upon the privilege of severing or extracting uranium an excise tax on the value of the gross product extracted beginning with the month that follows six (6) consecutive months at which the spot market price per pound of nonenriched uranium concentrate is at least fourteen United States dollars ($ 14.00) as determined by an average of the following international indexes or their successors quoting the monthly price of nonenriched uranium: “(i) Nuexco exchange value; “(ii) Nukem price range; “(iii) Ux U308 spot price. “(b) For purposes of subsection (a) of this section the spot market price of uranium used in this table is the price per pound on nonenriched uranium concentrate (U308). The excise tax in subsection (a) of this section, shall be applied in accordance with the following table: “Uranium Spot Market Price Tax Applied $14.00 to $15.00: 1% $15.01 to $16.00: 2% $16.01 to $17.99: 3% $18.00 or more: 4%.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 48, § 1, amended subsection (r) of W.S. 39-6-302, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-302(r) by ch. 51 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-506.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-507.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns, reports. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before February 25 of the year following the year of production any person whose property is subject to W.S. 39-14-502(a) shall sign under oath and submit a statement listing the information relative to the property and affairs of the company as the department may require to assess the property;

All information and reports shall be notarized and signed by a person who has legal authority to bind the taxpayer;

For mines and mining claims, the department may presume that the property is located in the county in which production is reported by the taxpayer. The department shall not direct any county to provide relief for taxes paid on taxable valuation which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county unless the taxpayer files or is directed to file amended returns within two (2) years of the date of the original certification of the production. Unless there is evidence of bad faith or willful disregard of production circumstances, no taxpayer shall be required to pay taxes on production which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county if relief for taxes paid is not allowed under this provision;

Except as provided in paragraph (v) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for severance taxes under W.S.

39-14-503

shall report monthly to the department. The monthly tax reports are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. Reports shall be filed on forms prescribed by the department. The department may allow extensions for filing returns by regulation;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance tax imposed under this article is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly reporting requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall report annually. The annual report is due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who reports annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence reporting monthly as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly reporting requirements or from monthly to annual reporting;

For mines and mining claims, the taxpayer shall report the location of the production to the county and tax district in which the mine or mining claim is located, based upon the actual taxable production produced by the mine in each county or tax district. Other reasonable methods of reporting the location of production may be approved by the department upon written request of the taxpayer or taxing jurisdiction.

Payment. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before October 10 the county treasurer shall send a written statement in sealed envelopes of total tax due, itemized as to property description, assessed value and mill levies, to each taxpayer at his last known address. Failure to send notice, or to demand payment of taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due;

Ad valorem taxes provided by this act are due and payable:

For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years, at the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the taxes are levied. Fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after September 1 and payable on and after November 10 in each year and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after March 1 and payable on and after May 10 of the succeeding calendar year except as hereafter provided. If the entire tax is paid on or before December 31, no interest or penalty is chargeable;

Effective January 1, 2020 for tax year 2020 and each year thereafter, ad valorem taxes are due as provided in W.S.

39-13-113

.

Except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for a severance tax under W.S. 39-14-503(a) shall pay monthly tax payments to the department. The payment shall be determined by the taxpayer based on the value of the gross product produced and saved during the second preceding month, and tax computed on value at rates prescribed in this article. The monthly tax payments are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. If the report the taxpayer is required to file shows tax due, the taxpayer shall pay the tax due when the report is filed. The department may allow extensions for paying taxes by regulation. The department may, if an extension is granted, request the payment of the reasonable estimate of ninety percent (90%) of the tax by the statutory due date, with the remaining tax remitted with the extended return;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance tax imposed under this article is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly payment requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall pay the tax annually. The annual payment is due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who pays annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence remitting tax payments as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly payment requirements or from monthly to annual payment.

Timelines. Except as otherwise specifically provided, there are no general applicable provisions for timelines for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2020 ch. 142, § 2, effective March 24, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

redesignated former (b)(ii) as the introductory language of (b)(ii) and (b)(ii)(A); in present (b)(ii)(A), added “For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years,” at the beginning; and added (b)(ii)(B) and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Statute not to be applied retroactively. —

Where the Wyoming Department of Revenue (DOR) changed the allocation of a company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-13-103(b)(xv), 39-14-107(a)(iii), 39-14-207(a)(iv), 39-14-307(a)(iii), 39-14-407(a)(iii), 39-14-507(a)(iii), 39-14-607(a)(iii), and 39-14-707(a)(iii) did not apply retroactively because there was substantial evidence that the events triggering the dispute in this case occurred prior to the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. § 39-2-201(j) in that the production, the discovery of the mis-allocation and the notice of the mis-allocation all occurred prior to the enactment and effective date of § 39-2-201(j). BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).